Tennessee, session 114, HB0863.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 5-1-127, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) In addition to the charter of incorporation, municipalities and counties may
post their code of ordinances or adopted resolutions, as applicable, on a website
maintained by the municipality or county, or on the website maintained by the secretary
of state if the municipality or county does not have or maintain a website. New
ordinances and resolutions must be posted within one (1) month of their adoption.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0863
003072
- 1 -